California, session 20252026, SB266.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 2601 is added to the Elections Code, to read:2601. (a) By December 15, 2029, and by December 15 of every subsequent year that immediately follows a year in which there is a presidential election, the Secretary of State shall do both of the following:(1) Determine the number of residents of voting age in each precinct who are members of a single language minority group, including language minority groups not subject to Section 203 of the federal Voting Rights Act of 1965 (52 U.S.C. Sec. 10503), and who lack sufficient skills in English to vote without assistance.(2) Make publicly available on the Secretary of State’s internet website a list of languages used by single language minority groups, including language minority groups not subject to Section 203 of the federal Voting Rights Act of 1965, that make up 3 percent or more of the voting-age residents of a particular county or precinct who lack sufficient skills in English to vote without assistance.(b) If interested citizens or organizations provide the Secretary of State with information that gives the Secretary of State sufficient reason to believe there is a need for the furnishing of translated ballots, the Secretary of State shall find that a significant and substantial need exists a need to provide translated ballots in the applicable language in the affected voting location and election materials pursuant to Sections 3010 and 3019.(c) Beginning January 1, 2030, for each election where a language is identified under subdivision (a) or (b), in order to ensure inclusive language access, the elections official shall provide language assistance as follows:(1) Whenever the elections official provides ballots, materials described in Sections 3010 and 10240, 3010, or notices and instructions described in Section 3019, the elections official shall provide those materials in English and in the language of the applicable language minority group.(2) The elections official shall provide a voter with the ballots and election materials described in Sections 3010 and 10240 in the language the voter has indicated as their language preference, if translations in that language are available pursuant to this section.(3) The elections official shall prominently provide information on their internet website on how a voter may request a vote by mail ballot in a language identified under subdivision (a) or (b), or under Section 14201.(4) The elections official shall provide notices and instructions described in Section 3019 in the language of a voter’s indicated preference if translations are available under this section in a manner consistent with state law.(d) It is the intent of the Legislature that non-English-speaking citizens, like all other citizens, should be encouraged to vote. Therefore, appropriate efforts should be made on a statewide basis to minimize obstacles to voting by citizens who lack sufficient skill in English to vote without assistance.(e) The Secretary of State may adopt regulations necessary to implement this section and to provide guidance to elections officials for its administration.(f) This section shall remain in effect regardless of any expiration, repeal, modification, or judicial interpretation of the federal Voting Rights Act of 1965.SEC. 2. Section 3019 of the Elections Code is amended to read:3019. (a) (1) Upon receiving a vote by mail ballot, the elections official shall compare the signature on the identification envelope with either of the following to determine if the signatures compare:(A) The signature appearing on the voter’s affidavit of registration or any previous affidavit of registration of the voter.(B) The signature appearing on a form issued by an elections official that contains the voter’s signature and that is part of the voter’s registration record.(2) All of the following apply to the comparison of signatures pursuant to this section, including the comparison of a voter’s signature on a signature verification statement, an unsigned identification envelope statement, or a combined vote by mail ballot signature verification statement and unsigned identification envelope statement, with the signature that is part of the voter’s registration record:(A) A presumption exists that the signature on the identification envelope, signature verification statement, unsigned identification envelope statement, or provisional ballot envelope is the voter’s signature.(B) An exact match is not required for an elections official to determine that a voter’s signature is valid. The fact that signatures share similar characteristics is sufficient to determine that a signature is valid.(C) Except as provided in subparagraph (D), the elections official shall consider explanations for discrepancies between signatures that are specified in regulations promulgated by the Secretary of State. For purposes of this subparagraph, explanations include a variation in signature style over time and the haste with which a signature is written.(D) When comparing signatures, an elections official shall not review or consider a voter’s party preference, race, or ethnicity.(E) The elections official may consider characteristics of the written signature that are specified in regulations promulgated by the Secretary of State. For purposes of this subparagraph, characteristics include the slant of the signature, letter formation, and whether the signature is printed or written in cursive.(F) The elections official may use facsimiles of voters’ signatures, provided that the method of preparing and displaying the facsimiles complies with the law.(G) In comparing signatures pursuant to this section, an elections official may use signature verification technology. If signature verification technology determines that the signatures do not compare, the signature is subject to the additional procedures described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (c).(H) The variation of a signature caused by the substitution of initials for the first or middle name, or both, is not grounds for the elections official to determine that the signatures do not compare.(I) A signature made using a mark such as an “X,” or made by a signature stamp, shall be presumed valid and shall be accepted if the signature meets the requirements of Section 354.5.(b) If upon conducting the comparison of signatures pursuant to subdivision (a) the elections official determines that the signatures compare, the elections official shall deposit the ballot, still in the identification envelope, in a ballot container in the elections official’s office.(c) (1) If upon conducting the comparison of signatures pursuant to subdivision (a) the elections official determines that the signature possesses multiple, significant, and obvious differing characteristics when compared to all signatures in the voter’s registration record, the signature is subject to the additional procedures described in paragraph (2).(2) If the elections official makes the determination described in paragraph (1), the signature shall be rejected only if two additional elections officials each find beyond a reasonable doubt that the signature differs in multiple, significant, and obvious respects from all signatures in the voter’s registration record. If the officials determine that the signatures do not compare, the identification envelope shall not be opened and the ballot shall not be counted. The elections official shall write the cause of the rejection on the face of the identification envelope only after completing the procedures described in subdivision (d).(d) (1) (A) Except as provided in subparagraph (E), on or before the next business day after a determination that a voter’s signature does not compare pursuant to subdivision (c), but not later than eight days prior to the certification of the election, the elections official shall send by first-class mail notice to the voter of the opportunity to verify the voter’s signature no later than 5 p.m. two days prior to the certification of the election. The notice shall include a return envelope, with postage paid, for the voter to return a signature verification statement.(B) If an elections official has a telephone number or email address on file for a voter whose signature does not compare pursuant to subdivision (c), the elections official shall notify the voter by telephone, a text message, or email of the opportunity to verify the voter’s signature. If an elections official calls the voter and the voter does not answer, the elections official shall attempt to leave a voicemail message.(C) Unless required pursuant to Section 3026, the elections official may send additional written notices to a voter identified pursuant to subdivision (c), and may also notify the voter in person or by other means of the opportunity to verify the voter’s signature.(D) Unless required pursuant to Section 3026, the elections official may use any information in a county’s election management system, or otherwise in the elections official’s possession, for the purpose of notifying the voter of the opportunity to verify the voter’s signature.(E) If it is impracticable under the circumstances for the elections official to send the notice described in subparagraph (A) on or before the next business day, including in the event of technological failure, the elections official shall send the notice as soon as practicable, but not later than eight days prior to the certification of the election.(2) The notice and instructions shall be in substantially the following form:“READ THESE INSTRUCTIONS CAREFULLY. FAILURE TO FOLLOW THESE INSTRUCTIONS MAY CAUSE YOUR VOTE BY MAIL BALLOT NOT TO COUNT.1. We have determined that the signature you provided on your vote by mail ballot does not compare with the signature(s) on file in your voter record. In order to ensure that your vote by mail ballot will be counted, the signature verification statement must be completed and returned as soon as possible.2. The signature verification statement must be received by the elections official of the county where you are registered to vote no later than 5 p.m. two days prior to certification of the election.3. You must sign your name where specified on the signature verification statement (Voter’s Signature).4. Place the signature verification statement into the postage-paid return envelope if it is included with these instructions. If a return envelope is not included with these instructions, use your own mailing envelope addressed to your local elections official. Mail, deliver, or have the completed statement delivered to the elections official. If you mail your completed statement using your own envelope, be sure there is sufficient postage and that the address of the elections official is correct.5. If you do not wish to send the signature verification statement by mail or have it delivered, you may submit your completed statement by email or facsimile transmission to your local elections official, or by other electronic means made available by your local elections official, or submit your completed statement to a polling place within the county or a ballot dropoff box before the close of the polls on election day.”(3) The notice and instructions shall be translated by the Secretary of State in all languages required in that county by Section 2601 and Section 203 of the federal Voting Rights Act of 1965 (52 U.S.C. Sec. 10503).(4) The elections official shall not reject a vote by mail ballot identified pursuant to subdivision (c) if each of the following conditions is satisfied:(A) The voter delivers, in person, by mail, by fax, by email, or by other means, a signature verification statement signed by the voter and the elections official receives the statement no later than 5 p.m. two days prior to the certification of the election, or the voter, before the close of the polls on election day, completes and submits a signature verification statement to a polling place within the county or a ballot dropoff box.(B) Upon receipt of the signature verification statement, the elections official shall compare the signature on the statement with the signature on file in the voter’s record.(i) If upon conducting the comparison of signatures the elections official determines that the signatures compare, the elections official shall deposit the ballot, still in the identification envelope, in a ballot container in the elections official’s office.(ii) If, under the standards and procedures of subdivision (c), a determination is made that the signatures do not compare, the identification envelope shall not be opened and the ballot shall not be counted. The elections official shall write the cause of the rejection on the face of the identification envelope.(5) The signature verification statement shall be in substantially the following form and may be included on the same page as the notice and instructions specified in paragraph (2):“SIGNATURE VERIFICATION STATEMENTI,, am a registered voter of __________ County,State of California. I declare under penalty of perjury that I received and returned a vote by mail ballot. I am a resident of the precinct in which I have voted, and I am the person whose name appears on the vote by mail ballot envelope. I understand that if I commit or attempt any fraud in connection with voting, or if I aid or abet fraud or attempt to aid or abet fraud in connection with voting, I may be convicted of a felony punishable by imprisonment for 16 months or two or three years. I understand that my failure to sign this statement means that my vote by mail ballot will be invalidated.Voter’s SignatureAddress” (6) The signature verification statement shall be translated by the Secretary of State in all languages required in that county by Section 2601 and Section 203 of the federal Voting Rights Act of 1965 (52 U.S.C. Sec. 10503).(6)(7) If the elections official determines that the signatures compare, the official shall use the signature in the signature verification statement, even if returned untimely, to update the voter’s signature for future elections.(e) (1) (A) Notwithstanding any other law, if an elections official determines that a voter has failed to sign the identification envelope, the elections official shall not reject the vote by mail ballot if the voter does any of the following:(i) Signs the identification envelope at the office of the elections official during regular business hours no later than 5 p.m. two days prior to the certification of the election.(ii) No later than 5 p.m. two days prior to the certification of the election, completes and submits an unsigned identification envelope statement in substantially the following form:“UNSIGNED IDENTIFICATION ENVELOPE STATEMENTI,, am a registered voter of __________ County,State of California. I declare under penalty of perjury that I received and returned a vote by mail ballot and that I have not and will not vote more than one ballot in this election. I am a resident of the precinct in which I have voted, and I am the person whose name appears on the vote by mail ballot envelope. I understand that if I commit or attempt any fraud in connection with voting, or if I aid or abet fraud or attempt to aid or abet fraud in connection with voting, I may be convicted of a felony punishable by imprisonment for 16 months or two or three years. I understand that my failure to sign this statement means that my vote by mail ballot will be invalidated.Voter’s SignatureAddress” (iii) Before the close of the polls on election day, completes and submits an unsigned identification envelope statement, in the form described in clause (ii), to a polling place within the county or a ballot dropoff box.(B) (i) Except as provided in clause (v), or before the next business day after discovering that a voter has failed to sign the identification envelope, but not later than eight days prior to the certification of the election, the elections official shall send by first-class mail notice and instructions to the voter of the opportunity to provide a signature no later than 5 p.m. two days prior to the certification of the election. The notice shall include a return envelope, with postage paid, for the voter to return the unsigned identification envelope statement.(ii) If an elections official has a telephone number or email address on file for a voter who has failed to sign the identification envelope, the elections official shall notify the voter by telephone, a text message, or email of the opportunity to provide a signature. If an elections official calls the voter and the voter does not answer, the elections official shall attempt to leave a voicemail message.(iii) Unless required pursuant to Section 3026, the elections official may send additional written notices to a voter identified pursuant to this subdivision, and may also notify the voter in person or by other means of the opportunity to provide a signature.(iv) Unless required pursuant to Section 3026, the elections official may use any information in the county’s election management system, or otherwise in the elections official’s possession, for the purpose of notifying the voter of the opportunity to provide a signature.(v) If it is impracticable under the circumstances for the elections official to send the notice described in clause (i) on or before the next business day, including in the event of technological failure, the elections official shall send the notice as soon as practicable, but not later than eight days prior to the certification of the election.(C) If timely submitted, the elections official shall accept any completed unsigned identification envelope statement. Upon receipt of the unsigned identification envelope statement, the elections official shall compare the voter’s signature on the statement in the manner provided by this section.(i) If the elections official determines that the signatures compare, the elections official shall attach the unsigned identification envelope statement to the identification envelope and deposit the ballot, still in the identification envelope, in a ballot container in the elections official’s office.(ii) If, under the standards and procedures of subdivision (c), a determination is made that the signatures do not compare, the identification envelope shall not be opened and the elections official shall provide notice to the voter pursuant to subdivisions (c) and (d).(D) An elections official may use methods other than those described in subparagraph (A) to obtain a voter’s signature on an unsigned identification envelope statement.(2) Instructions shall accompany the unsigned identification envelope statement in substantially the following form:“READ THESE INSTRUCTIONS CAREFULLY BEFORE COMPLETING THE STATEMENT. FAILURE TO FOLLOW THESE INSTRUCTIONS MAY CAUSE YOUR BALLOT NOT TO COUNT.1. In order to ensure that your vote by mail ballot will be counted, your statement should be completed and returned as soon as possible, but no later than 5 p.m. two days prior to the certification of the election.2. You must sign your name on the line above (Voter’s Signature).3. Place the statement into the postage-paid return envelope if it is included with these instructions. If a return envelope is not included with these instructions, use your own mailing envelope addressed to your local elections official. Mail, deliver, or have delivered the completed statement to the elections official. If you mail your completed statement using your own envelope, be sure there is sufficient postage and that the address of the elections official is correct.4. If you do not wish to send the statement by mail or have it delivered, you may submit your completed statement by facsimile or email transmission to your local elections official, or by other electronic means made available by your local elections official, or submit your completed statement to a polling place within the county or a ballot dropoff box before the close of the polls on election day.”(3) The notice and instructions shall be translated notice, instructions, and statement shall be translated by the Secretary of State in all languages required in that county by Section 2601 and Section 203 of the federal Voting Rights Act of 1965 (52 U.S.C. Sec. 10503).(f) An elections official shall include a single, combined vote by mail ballot signature verification statement and unsigned ballot identification envelope statement, along with the instructions provided in this section for the completion of the statement, on the elections official’s internet website and shall provide the elections official’s mailing address, email address, and facsimile transmission number on the internet web page containing the statement and instructions. The elections official shall accept the combined statement from a voter for the purpose of satisfying the requirements of paragraph (4) of subdivision (d) or subparagraph (C) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (e). An elections official may mail the combined statement to a voter pursuant to subdivision (d) or (e) in lieu of the signature verification statement or unsigned ballot identification envelope statement.(g) A local elections official offering other electronic means for submission of a statement described in this section shall establish appropriate privacy and security protocols that ensure that the information transmitted is received directly and securely by the elections official and is only used for the stated purposes of verifying the signature on the voter’s ballot.(h) A ballot shall not be removed from its identification envelope until the time for processing ballots. A ballot shall not be rejected for cause after the identification envelope has been opened.(i) For purposes of this section, “certification of the election” means the date the particular elections official submits a certified statement of the results of the election to the governing body pursuant to Section 15372, even if that occurs before the deadline to submit the certified statement of the election results set forth in Section 15372.(j) In comparing signatures pursuant to this section, including when using signature verification software or other technology, an elections official shall adhere to all applicable regulations promulgated by the Secretary of State.(k) An elections official is authorized to use contact information provided on a voter’s affidavit of registration to contact a voter for purposes consistent with this section.SEC. 3. Section 4005 of the Elections Code, as amended by Section 1 of Chapter 480 of the Statutes of 2024, is amended to read:4005. (a) Notwithstanding Section 4000 or any other law, any county may conduct any election as an all-mailed ballot election if all of the following apply:(1) (A) At least two ballot dropoff locations are provided within the jurisdiction where the election is held or the number of ballot dropoff locations are fixed in a manner so that there is at least one ballot dropoff location provided for every 15,000 registered voters within the jurisdiction where the election is held, as determined on the 88th day before the day of the election, whichever results in more ballot dropoff locations. For purposes of this subparagraph, a vote center that includes an exterior ballot drop box counts only as a single ballot dropoff location. Ballot dropoff locations shall comply with the regulations adopted pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 3025.(B) A ballot dropoff location provided for under this section consists of a secure, accessible, and locked ballot box located as near as possible to established public transportation routes and that is able to receive voted ballots. All ballot dropoff locations shall be open at least during regular business hours beginning not less than 28 days before the day of the election, and on the day of the election. At least one ballot dropoff location shall be an accessible, secured, exterior drop box that is available for a minimum of 12 hours per day including regular business hours.(2) (A) The county elections official permits a voter residing in the county to do any of the following at a vote center:(i) Return, or vote and return, the voter’s vote by mail ballot.(ii) Register to vote, update the voter’s voter registration, and vote pursuant to Section 2170.(iii) Receive and vote a provisional ballot pursuant to Section 3016 or Article 5 (commencing with Section 14310) of Chapter 3 of Division 14.(iv) Receive a replacement ballot upon verification that a ballot for the same election has not been received from the voter by the county elections official. If the county elections official is unable to determine if a ballot for the same election has been received from the voter, the county elections official may issue a provisional ballot.(v) Vote a regular, provisional, or replacement ballot using accessible voting equipment that provides for a private and independent voting experience.(B) Each vote center shall have at least three voting machines that are accessible to voters with disabilities.(3) (A) On the day of the election, from 7 a.m. to 8 p.m., inclusive, and on each of the three days before the election, for a minimum of eight hours per day, at least one vote center is provided for every 10,000 registered voters within the jurisdiction where the election is held, as determined on the 88th day before the day of the election. At least 90 percent of the number of vote centers required by this subparagraph shall be open for all four days during the required times. Up to 10 percent of the number of vote centers required by this subparagraph may be open for less than four days if at least one vote center is provided for every 10,000 registered voters on each day.(B) Notwithstanding subparagraph (A), for a jurisdiction with fewer than 20,000 registered voters, a minimum of two vote centers are provided on the day of the election and on each of the three days before the election within the jurisdiction where the election is held.(4) (A) Beginning 10 days before the day of the election and continuing daily up to and including the fourth day before the election, for a minimum of eight hours per day, at least one vote center is provided for every 50,000 registered voters within the jurisdiction where the election is held, as determined on the 88th day before the day of the election.(B) Notwithstanding subparagraph (A), for a jurisdiction with fewer than 50,000 registered voters, a minimum of two vote centers are provided within the jurisdiction where the election is held.(C) The vote centers provided under this section are established in accordance with the accessibility requirements described in Article 5 (commencing with Section 12280) of Chapter 3 of Division 12, the federal Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990 (42 U.S.C. Sec. 12101 et seq.), the federal Help America Vote Act of 2002 (52 U.S.C. Sec. 20901 et seq.), and the federal Voting Rights Act of 1965 (52 U.S.C. Sec. 10101 et seq.).(D) The vote centers provided under this section are equitably distributed across the county so as to afford maximally convenient options for voters and are established at accessible locations as near as possible to established public transportation routes. The vote centers shall be equipped with voting units or systems that are accessible to individuals with disabilities and that provide the same opportunity for access and participation as is provided to voters who are not disabled, including the ability to vote privately and independently in accordance with Sections 12280 and 19240.(E) (i) The vote centers provided under this section have an electronic mechanism for the county elections official to immediately access, at a minimum, all of the following voter registration data:(I) Name.(II) Address.(III) Date of birth.(IV) Language preference.(V) Party preference.(VI) Precinct.(VII) Whether or not the voter has been issued a vote by mail ballot and whether or not a ballot has been received by the county elections official.(ii) The electronic mechanism used to access voter registration data shall not be connected in any way to a voting system.(5) A method is available for voters with disabilities to request and receive a blank vote by mail ballot and, if a replacement ballot is necessary, a blank replacement ballot that voters with disabilities can read and mark privately and independently pursuant to the federal Help America Vote Act of 2002 (52 U.S.C. Sec. 20901 et seq.).(6) (A) Except as otherwise provided for in this section, election boards for the vote centers established under this section meet the requirements for eligibility and composition pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 12300) of Chapter 4 of Division 12.(B) Each vote center provides language assistance in all languages required in the jurisdiction under Section 2601, subdivision (c) of Section 12303, or Section 203 of the federal Voting Rights Act of 1965 (52 U.S.C. Sec. 10101 et seq.) in a manner that enables voters of the applicable language minority groups to participate effectively in the electoral process. Each vote center shall post information regarding the availability of language assistance in English and all other languages for which language assistance is required to be provided in the jurisdiction under Section 2601, subdivision (c) of Section 12303, or Section 203 of the federal Voting Rights Act of 1965 (52 U.S.C. Sec. 10101 et seq.).(i) If a vote center is located in, or adjacent to, a precinct, census tract, or other defined geographical subsection required to establish language requirements under subdivision (c) of Section 12303 or Section 203 of the federal Voting Rights Act of 1965 (52 U.S.C. Sec. 10101 et seq.), or if it is identified as needing language assistance through the public input process described in clause (ii), the county elections official shall ensure that the vote center is staffed by election board members who speak the required language. If the county elections official is unable to recruit election board members who speak the required language, alternative methods of effective language assistance shall be provided by the county elections official.(ii) The county elections official shall solicit public input regarding which vote centers should be staffed by election board members who are fluent in a language in addition to English pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 12303 and Section 203 of the federal Voting Rights Act of 1965 (52 U.S.C. Sec. 10101 et seq.).(iii) The county elections official shall provide notice in the sample ballot, in vote by mail materials, and on the official’s internet website of the specific language services available at each vote center.(iv) Each vote center shall post information regarding the availability of language assistance services, including any language assistance hotlines provided by the county or Secretary of State.(C) Each vote center provides election materials translated in all languages required in the jurisdiction under Section 2601, subdivision (a) of Section 14201, and Section 203 of the federal Voting Rights Act of 1965 (52 U.S.C. Sec. 10101 et seq.).(D) Each vote center provides reasonable modifications and auxiliary aids and services as required by the federal Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990 (42 U.S.C. Sec. 12101 et seq.) and the federal Rehabilitation Act of 1973 (29 U.S.C. Sec. 701 et seq.).(7) (A) Beginning 10 days before the election, the county elections official maintains, in an electronic format, an index of voters who have done any of the following at one of the vote centers established pursuant to this section:(i) Registered to vote or updated the voter’s voter registration.(ii) Received and voted a provisional ballot or replacement ballot.(iii) Voted a ballot using equipment at the vote center.(B) The index required by subparagraph (A) includes the same information for each voter as is required to be included on copies of the roster that are posted pursuant to Section 14294. The index required by subparagraph (A) shall be updated continuously during any time that a vote center is open in the jurisdiction.(8) (A) No later than 29 days before the day of the election, the county elections official begins mailing to registered voters a vote by mail ballot packet that includes a return envelope with instructions for the use and return of the vote by mail ballot. The county elections official shall have five days to mail a ballot to each person who is registered to vote on the 29th day before the day of the election and five days for each subsequent registered voter. The county elections official shall not discriminate against any region or precinct in the county in choosing which ballots to mail first within the prescribed five-day mailing period.(B) The county elections official delivers to each voter, with either the sample ballot sent pursuant to Section 13303 or with the vote by mail ballot packet, all of the following:(i) A notice, translated in all languages identified pursuant to Section 2601 in its county as well as languages required under subdivision (a) of Section 14201 and Section 203 of the federal Voting Rights Act of 1965 (52 U.S.C. Sec. 10101 et seq.), that informs voters of all of the following:(I) An all-mailed ballot election is being conducted and each eligible voter will be issued a vote by mail ballot by mail.(II) The voter may cast a vote by mail ballot in person at a vote center during the times and days specified in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (4) or on election day.(III) No later than seven days before the day of the election, the voter may request the county elections official to send a vote by mail ballot in a language other than English pursuant to Section 203 of the federal Voting Rights Act of 1965 (52 U.S.C. Sec. 10101 et seq.), Section 2601, or Section 14201.(IV) No later than seven days before the day of the election, the voter may request the county elections official to send or deliver a ballot that voters with disabilities can read and mark privately and independently pursuant to the federal Help America Vote Act of 2002 (52 U.S.C. Sec. 20901 et seq.).(V) Language assistance hotlines provided by the county or Secretary of State.(ii) A list of the ballot dropoff locations and vote centers established pursuant to this section, including the dates and hours they are open. The list shall also be posted on the internet website of the county elections official in a format that is accessible for people with disabilities pursuant to Section 11135 of the Government Code.(iii) A postage-paid postcard that the voter may return to the county elections official for the purpose of requesting a vote by mail ballot in a language other than English or for the purpose of requesting a vote by mail ballot in an accessible format.(C) Upon request, the county elections official provides written voting materials to voters with disabilities in an accessible format, as required by the federal Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990 (42 U.S.C. Sec. 12101 et seq.) and the federal Rehabilitation Act of 1973 (29 U.S.C. Sec. 701 et seq.).(9) (A) The county elections official establishes a language accessibility advisory committee that is comprised of representatives of language minority communities. The committee shall be established and hold its first meeting before the public meeting required by clause (i) of subparagraph (A) of paragraph (10).(B) The county elections official establishes a voting accessibility advisory committee that is comprised of voters with disabilities. The committee shall be established and hold its first meeting before the public meeting required by clause (ii) of subparagraph (A) of paragraph (10).(C) In a county with more than 500,000 registered voters, the county elections official establishes a voter education and outreach advisory committee that is comprised of voter engagement, education, and community outreach advocates. The committee shall be established and hold its first meeting before the public meeting required by clause (iii) of subparagraph (A) of paragraph (10).(D) A county with fewer than 50,000 registered voters may establish a joint advisory committee for language minority communities and voters with disabilities.(10) (A) The county elections official develops a draft plan for the administration of elections conducted pursuant to this section in consultation with the public, including all of the following:(i) One meeting, publicly noticed at least 10 days in advance of the meeting and held prior to the noticing of the draft plan pursuant to subparagraph (C), that includes representatives, advocates, and other stakeholders representing each community for which the county is required to provide voting materials and assistance in a language other than English under subdivision (a) of Section 14201 and the federal Voting Rights Act of 1965 (52 U.S.C. Sec. 10101 et seq.).(ii) One meeting, publicly noticed at least 10 days in advance of the meeting and held prior to the noticing of the draft plan pursuant to subparagraph (C), that includes representatives from the disability community and community organizations and individuals that advocate on behalf of, or provide services to, individuals with disabilities.(iii) In a county with more than 500,000 registered voters, one meeting, publicly noticed at least 10 days in advance of the meeting and held prior to the noticing of the draft plan pursuant to subparagraph (C), that includes voter education and outreach advocates.(B) The county elections official, when developing the draft plan for the administration of elections conducted pursuant to this section, considers, at a minimum, all of the following:(i) Vote center and ballot dropoff location proximity to public transportation.(ii) Vote center and ballot dropoff location proximity to communities with historically low vote by mail usage.(iii) Vote center and ballot dropoff location proximity to population centers.(iv) Vote center and ballot dropoff location proximity to language minority communities.(v) Vote center and ballot dropoff location proximity to voters with disabilities.(vi) Vote center and ballot dropoff location proximity to communities with low rates of household vehicle ownership.(vii) Vote center and ballot dropoff location proximity to low-income communities.(viii) Vote center and ballot dropoff location proximity to communities of eligible voters who are not registered to vote and may need access to same day voter registration.(ix) Vote center and ballot dropoff location proximity to geographically isolated populations, including Native American reservations.(x) Access to accessible and free parking at vote centers and ballot dropoff locations.(xi) The distance and time a voter must travel by car or public transportation to a vote center and ballot dropoff location.(xii) The need for alternate methods for voters with disabilities for whom vote by mail ballots are not accessible to cast a ballot.(xiii) Traffic patterns near vote centers and ballot dropoff locations.(xiv) The need for mobile vote centers in addition to the number of vote centers established pursuant to this section.(xv) Vote center location on a public or private university or college campus.(C) The county elections official publicly notices the draft plan for the administration of elections conducted pursuant to this section and accepts public comments on the draft plan for at least 14 days before the public hearing held pursuant to subparagraph (D).(D) (i) Following the 14-day review period required by subparagraph (C), the county elections official holds a public hearing to consider the draft plan for the administration of elections conducted pursuant to this section and to accept public comments. The meeting shall be publicly noticed at least 10 days in advance of the meeting on the internet websites of the clerk of the county board of supervisors and the county elections official, or, if neither the clerk of the county board of supervisors nor the county elections official maintain an internet website, in the office of the county elections official.(ii) After the public hearing to consider the draft plan for the administration of elections conducted pursuant to this section and to accept public comments, the county elections official shall consider any public comments the official receives from the public and shall amend the draft plan in response to the public comments to the extent the official deems appropriate. The county elections official shall publicly notice the amended draft plan and shall accept public comments on the amended draft plan for at least 14 days before the county elections official may adopt the amended draft plan pursuant to subparagraph (E).(E) (i) No later than 120 days before the election and following the 14-day review and comment period required by clause (ii) of subparagraph (D), the county elections official shall adopt a final plan for the administration of elections conducted pursuant to this section. The county elections official shall submit the voter education and outreach plan that is required by clause (i) of subparagraph (I) to the Secretary of State for approval.(ii) The Secretary of State shall approve, approve with modifications, or reject a voter education and outreach plan submitted pursuant to clause (i) of subparagraph (I) within 14 days after the plan is submitted by the county elections official.(iii) The draft plan, the amended draft plan, and the adopted final plan for the administration of elections conducted pursuant to this section shall be posted on the internet website of the county elections official in each language in which the county is required to provide voting materials and assistance under subdivision (a) of Section 14201 and the federal Voting Rights Act of 1965 (52 U.S.C. Sec. 10101 et seq.), and the Secretary of State’s internet website in a format that is accessible for people with disabilities pursuant to Section 11135 of the Government Code.(F) Public meetings held pursuant to this paragraph shall, upon request, provide auxiliary aids and services to ensure effective communication with people with disabilities.(G) Within two years of the adoption of the first plan for the administration of elections conducted pursuant to this section, the county elections official shall hold public meetings in accordance with the procedures described in subparagraphs (C) to (F), inclusive, to consider revising the first plan for the administration of elections conducted pursuant to this section. Every four years thereafter, the county elections official shall hold public meetings in accordance with the procedures described in subparagraphs (C) to (F), inclusive, to consider revising the plan for the administration of elections conducted pursuant to this section.(H) (i) With reasonable public notification, a county elections official may amend a plan for the administration of elections conducted pursuant to this section no more than 120 days before the date of an election held pursuant to this section.(ii) With reasonable public notification, a county elections official may amend a plan for the administration of elections conducted pursuant to this section more than 120 days before the date of an election held pursuant to this section if the official provides at least 30 days to accept public comments on the amended plan.(I) The plan for the administration of elections conducted pursuant to this section, includes all of the following:(i) A voter education and outreach plan that is approved by the Secretary of State and that includes all of the following:(I) A description of how the county elections official will use the media, including social media, newspapers, radio, and television that serve language minority communities for purposes of informing voters of the upcoming election and promoting the toll-free voter assistance hotline.(II) A description of how the county elections official will use the media, including social media, newspapers, radio, and television for purposes of informing voters of the availability of a vote by mail ballot in an accessible format and the process for requesting such a ballot.(III) A description of how the county elections official will have a community presence to educate voters regarding the provisions of this section.(IV) A description of the accessible information that will be publicly available on the accessible internet website of the county elections official.(V) A description of the method used by the county elections official to identify language minority voters.(VI) A description of how the county elections official will educate and communicate the provisions of this section to the public, including:(ia) Communities for which the county is required to provide voting materials and assistance in a language other than English under subdivision (a) of Section 14201 and the federal Voting Rights Act of 1965 (52 U.S.C. Sec. 10101 et seq.). The county elections official shall hold at least one bilingual voter education workshop for each language in which the county is required to provide voting materials and assistance in a language other than English under subdivision (a) of Section 14201 and the federal Voting Rights Act of 1965 (52 U.S.C. Sec. 10101 et seq.).(ib) The disability community, including organizations and individuals that advocate on behalf of, or provide services to, individuals with disabilities. The county elections official shall hold at least one voter education workshop to increase accessibility and participation of eligible voters with disabilities.(VII) A description of how the county will spend the necessary resources on voter education and outreach to ensure that voters are fully informed about the election. This description shall include information about the amount of money the county plans to spend on voter education and outreach activities under the plan, and how that compares to the amount of money spent on voter education and outreach in recent similar elections in the same jurisdiction.(VIII) At least one public service announcement in the media, including newspapers, radio, and television, that serve English-speaking citizens for purposes of informing voters of the upcoming election and promoting the toll-free voter assistance hotline. Outreach made under this subclause shall include access for voters who are deaf or hard of hearing and voters who are blind or visually impaired.(IX) At least one public service announcement in the media, including newspapers, radio, and television, that serve non-English-speaking citizens for each language in which the county is required to provide voting materials and assistance under subdivision (a) of Section 14201 and the federal Voting Rights Act of 1965 (52 U.S.C. Sec. 10101 et seq.) for purposes of informing voters of the upcoming election and promoting the toll-free voter assistance hotline.(X) At least two direct contacts with voters for purposes of informing voters of the upcoming election and promoting the toll-free voter assistance hotline. The two direct contacts are in addition to any other required contacts, including, but not limited to, sample ballots and the delivery of vote by mail ballots.(ia) After the first six statewide elections conducted pursuant to this section, a county elections official may make one direct contact if the county elections official does both of the following:(Ia) Revises the plan for the administration of elections pursuant to subparagraph (G) to explain how at least half of the funds saved from not making a second direct contact will be used on targeted outreach to historically underrepresented voters.(Ib) Spends at least half of the funds saved from not making a second direct contact on targeted outreach to historically underrepresented voters.(ib) If direct contact is made by mail, the county elections official must mail at least one copy of each direct contact to voters with the same surname and postal address, in each language requested.(ic) At least one direct contact shall be made with voters during an election that is conducted either in a jurisdiction with fewer than 30,000 registered voters or conducted pursuant to subdivision (b) within 30 days of a regularly scheduled statewide election.(id) Notwithstanding sub-subclause (ia), a county elections official shall make at least two direct contacts with a voter for the first six statewide elections that the voter is registered to vote in the county.(ii) A description of how a voter with disabilities may request and receive a blank vote by mail ballot and, if a replacement ballot is necessary, a blank replacement ballot that a voter with disabilities can mark privately and independently.(iii) A description of how the county elections official will address significant disparities in voter accessibility and participation identified in the report required by subdivision (g).(iv) A description of the methods and standards that the county elections official will use to ensure the security of voting conducted at vote centers.(v) Information about estimated short-term and long-term costs and savings from conducting elections pursuant to this section as compared to recent similar elections in the same jurisdiction that were not conducted pursuant to this section.(vi) To the extent available at the time of publication, information on all of the following:(I) The total number of vote centers to be established.(II) The total number of ballot dropoff locations to be established.(III) The location of each vote center.(IV) The location of each ballot dropoff location and whether it is inside or outside.(V) A map of the locations of each vote center and ballot dropoff location.(VI) The hours of operation for each vote center.(VII) The hours of operation for each ballot dropoff location.(VIII) The security and contingency plans that would be implemented by the county elections official to do both of the following:(ia) Prevent a disruption of the vote center process.(ib) Ensure that the election is properly conducted if a disruption occurs.(IX) The number of election board members and the number of bilingual election board members and the languages spoken.(X) The services provided to voters with disabilities, including, but not limited to, the type and number of accessible voting machines and reasonable modifications at each vote center.(XI) The design, layout, and placement of equipment inside each vote center that protects each voter’s right to cast a private and independent ballot.(vii) A toll-free voter assistance hotline that is accessible to voters who are deaf or hard of hearing, and that is maintained by the county elections official that is operational no later than 29 days before the day of the election until 5 p.m. on the day after the election. The toll-free voter assistance hotline shall provide assistance to voters in all languages in which the county is required to provide voting materials and assistance under Section 2601, subdivision (a) of Section 14201, and the federal Voting Rights Act of 1965 (52 U.S.C. Sec. 10101 et seq.).(J) The plan for the administration of elections conducted pursuant to this section is posted in a format that is accessible to persons with disabilities on the internet website of the Secretary of State and on the internet website of the county elections official.(b) Notwithstanding Section 4000 or any other law, any county may conduct a special election as an all-mailed ballot election under this section if all of the following apply:(1) The county elections official has done either of the following:(A) Previously conducted an election as an all-mailed ballot election in accordance with subdivision (a).(B) Adopted a final plan for the administration of elections pursuant to clause (i) of subparagraph (E) of paragraph (10) of subdivision (a), in which case the county elections official shall complete all activities provided for in the voter education and outreach plan that is required by clause (i) of subparagraph (I) of paragraph (10) of subdivision (a) before the day of the special election.(2) (A) On the day of the election, from 7 a.m. to 8 p.m., inclusive, at least one vote center is provided for every 30,000 registered voters. If the jurisdiction is not wholly contained within the county, the county elections official shall make a reasonable effort to establish a vote center within the jurisdiction where the special election is held.(B) Notwithstanding subparagraph (A), for a jurisdiction with fewer than 30,000 registered voters, the county elections official makes a reasonable effort to establish a vote center.(3) (A) Not less than 10 days before the day of the election, for a minimum of eight hours per day, at least one vote center is provided for every 60,000 registered voters. If the jurisdiction is not wholly contained within the county, the county elections official shall make a reasonable effort to establish a vote center within the jurisdiction where the special election is held.(B) Notwithstanding subparagraph (A), for a jurisdiction with fewer than 30,000 registered voters, the county elections official makes a reasonable effort to establish a vote center.(4) (A) At least one ballot dropoff location is provided for every 15,000 registered voters. At least one ballot dropoff location shall be located within the jurisdiction where the special election is held. All ballot dropoff locations shall be open at least during regular business hours beginning not less than 28 days before the day of the election, and on the day of the election.(B) Notwithstanding subparagraph (A), for a jurisdiction with fewer than 15,000 registered voters, at least one ballot dropoff location shall be provided.(c) Except as otherwise provided in this section, the election day procedures shall be conducted in accordance with Division 14 (commencing with Section 14000).(d) The county elections official may provide, at the official’s discretion, additional ballot dropoff locations and vote centers for purposes of this section.(e) The return of voted vote by mail ballots is subject to Sections 3017 and 3020.(f) For the sole purpose of reporting the results of an election conducted pursuant to this section, upon completion of the ballot count, the county elections official shall divide the jurisdiction into precincts pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 12220) of Chapter 3 of Division 12 and shall prepare a statement of the results of the election in accordance with Sections 15373 and 15374.(g) (1) (A) Within six months of each election conducted pursuant to this section, the Secretary of State shall submit a final report to the Legislature on all of the following information by categories of race, ethnicity, language preference, age, gender, disability, permanent vote by mail status, historical polling place voters, political party affiliation, and language minorities as it relates to the languages required under Section 2601, subdivision (a) of Section 14201, and Section 203 of the federal Voting Rights Act of 1965 (52 U.S.C. Sec. 10101 et seq.):(i) Voter turnout.(ii) Voter registration.(iii) Ballot rejection rates.(iv) Reasons for ballot rejection.(v) Provisional ballot use.(vi) Accessible vote by mail ballot use.(vii) The number of votes cast at each vote center.(viii) The number of ballots returned at ballot dropoff locations.(ix) The number of ballots returned by mail.(x) The number of persons who registered to vote at a vote center.(xi) Instances of voter fraud.(xii) Any other problems that became known to the county elections official or the Secretary of State during the election or canvass.(B) The report required by subparagraph (A) shall be posted on the internet website of the Secretary of State in a format that is accessible for people with disabilities pursuant to Section 11135 of the Government Code.(C) The report required by subparagraph (A) shall be submitted to the Legislature in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.(D) If an election is conducted pursuant to this section, the county shall submit, to the extent possible, to the Secretary of State the information needed for the Secretary of State to prepare the report required by subparagraph (A).(E) The Secretary of State may contract with any qualified person or organization for purposes of preparing the report required by subparagraph (A).(2) Within nine months of the certification of the results of each election conducted pursuant to this section, the county elections official shall post on the official’s internet website a report that compares the cost of elections conducted pursuant to this section to the costs of previous elections. The report shall be posted in a format that is accessible for people with disabilities pursuant to Section 11135 of the Government Code.(h) The Secretary of State shall enforce the provisions of this section pursuant to Section 12172.5 of the Government Code.(i) For purposes of this section, “disability” has the same meaning as defined in subdivisions (j), (m), and (n) of Section 12926 of the Government Code.(j) This section shall remain in effect until December 31, 2029, and as of that date is repealed.SEC. 4. Section 4005 of the Elections Code, as added by Section 2 of Chapter 480 of the Statutes of 2024, is amended to read:4005. (a) Notwithstanding Section 4000 or any other law, any county may conduct any election as an all-mailed ballot election if all of the following apply:(1) (A) At least two ballot dropoff locations are provided within the jurisdiction where the election is held or the number of ballot dropoff locations are fixed in a manner so that there is at least one ballot dropoff location provided for every 15,000 registered voters within the jurisdiction where the election is held, as determined on the 88th day before the day of the election, whichever results in more ballot dropoff locations. For purposes of this subparagraph, a vote center that includes an exterior ballot drop box counts only as a single ballot dropoff location. Ballot dropoff locations shall comply with the regulations adopted pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 3025.(B) A ballot dropoff location provided for under this section consists of a secure, accessible, and locked ballot box located as near as possible to established public transportation routes and that is able to receive voted ballots. All ballot dropoff locations shall be open at least during regular business hours beginning not less than 28 days before the day of the election, and on the day of the election. At least one ballot dropoff location shall be an accessible, secured, exterior drop box that is available for a minimum of 12 hours per day including regular business hours.(2) (A) The county elections official permits a voter residing in the county to do any of the following at a vote center:(i) Return, or vote and return, the voter’s vote by mail ballot.(ii) Register to vote, update the voter’s voter registration, and vote pursuant to Section 2170.(iii) Receive and vote a provisional ballot pursuant to Section 3016 or Article 5 (commencing with Section 14310) of Chapter 3 of Division 14.(iv) Receive a replacement ballot upon verification that a ballot for the same election has not been received from the voter by the county elections official. If the county elections official is unable to determine if a ballot for the same election has been received from the voter, the county elections official may issue a provisional ballot.(v) Vote a regular, provisional, or replacement ballot using accessible voting equipment that provides for a private and independent voting experience.(B) Each vote center shall have at least three voting machines that are accessible to voters with disabilities.(3) (A) On the day of the election, from 7 a.m. to 8 p.m., inclusive, and on each of the three days before the election, for a minimum of eight hours per day, at least one vote center is provided for every 10,000 registered voters within the jurisdiction where the election is held, as determined on the 88th day before the day of the election. At least 90 percent of the number of vote centers required by this subparagraph shall be open for all four days during the required times. Up to 10 percent of the number of vote centers required by this subparagraph may be open for less than four days if at least one vote center is provided for every 10,000 registered voters on each day.(B) Notwithstanding subparagraph (A), for a jurisdiction with fewer than 20,000 registered voters, a minimum of two vote centers are provided on the day of the election and on each of the three days before the election within the jurisdiction where the election is held.(4) (A) Beginning 10 days before the day of the election and continuing daily up to and including the fourth day before the election, for a minimum of eight hours per day, at least one vote center is provided for every 50,000 registered voters within the jurisdiction where the election is held, as determined on the 88th day before the day of the election.(B) Notwithstanding subparagraph (A), for a jurisdiction with fewer than 50,000 registered voters, a minimum of two vote centers are provided within the jurisdiction where the election is held.(C) The vote centers provided under this section are established in accordance with the accessibility requirements described in Article 5 (commencing with Section 12280) of Chapter 3 of Division 12, the federal Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990 (42 U.S.C. Sec. 12101 et seq.), the federal Help America Vote Act of 2002 (52 U.S.C. Sec. 20901 et seq.), and the federal Voting Rights Act of 1965 (52 U.S.C. Sec. 10101 et seq.).(D) The vote centers provided under this section are equitably distributed across the county so as to afford maximally convenient options for voters and are established at accessible locations as near as possible to established public transportation routes. The vote centers shall be equipped with voting units or systems that are accessible to individuals with disabilities and that provide the same opportunity for access and participation as is provided to voters who are not disabled, including the ability to vote privately and independently in accordance with Sections 12280 and 19240.(E) (i) The vote centers provided under this section have an electronic mechanism for the county elections official to immediately access, at a minimum, all of the following voter registration data:(I) Name.(II) Address.(III) Date of birth.(IV) Language preference.(V) Party preference.(VI) Precinct.(VII) Whether or not the voter has been issued a vote by mail ballot and whether or not a ballot has been received by the county elections official.(ii) The electronic mechanism used to access voter registration data shall not be connected in any way to a voting system.(5) A method is available for voters with disabilities to request and receive a blank vote by mail ballot and, if a replacement ballot is necessary, a blank replacement ballot that voters with disabilities can read and mark privately and independently pursuant to the federal Help America Vote Act of 2002 (52 U.S.C. Sec. 20901 et seq.).(6) (A) Except as otherwise provided for in this section, election boards for the vote centers established under this section meet the requirements for eligibility and composition pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 12300) of Chapter 4 of Division 12.(B) Each vote center provides language assistance in all languages required in the jurisdiction under Section 2601, subdivision (c) of Section 12303, or Section 203 of the federal Voting Rights Act of 1965 (52 U.S.C. Sec. 10101 et seq.) in a manner that enables voters of the applicable language minority groups to participate effectively in the electoral process. Each vote center shall post information regarding the availability of language assistance in English and all other languages for which language assistance is required to be provided in the jurisdiction under Section 2601, subdivision (c) of Section 12303, or Section 203 of the federal Voting Rights Act of 1965 (52 U.S.C. Sec. 10101 et seq.).(i) If a vote center is located in, or adjacent to, a precinct, census tract, or other defined geographical subsection required to establish language requirements under subdivision (c) of Section 12303 or Section 203 of the federal Voting Rights Act of 1965 (52 U.S.C. Sec. 10101 et seq.), or if it is identified as needing language assistance through the public input process described in clause (ii), the county elections official shall ensure that the vote center is staffed by election board members who speak the required language. If the county elections official is unable to recruit election board members who speak the required language, alternative methods of effective language assistance shall be provided by the county elections official.(ii) The county elections official shall solicit public input regarding which vote centers should be staffed by election board members who are fluent in a language in addition to English pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 12303 and Section 203 of the federal Voting Rights Act of 1965 (52 U.S.C. Sec. 10101 et seq.).(iii) The county elections official shall provide notice in the sample ballot, in vote by mail materials, and on the official’s internet website of the specific language services available at each vote center.(iv) Each vote center shall post information regarding the availability of language assistance services, including any language assistance hotlines provided by the county or Secretary of State.(C) Each vote center provides election materials translated in all languages required in the jurisdiction under Section 2601, subdivision (a) of Section 14201, and Section 203 of the federal Voting Rights Act of 1965 (52 U.S.C. Sec. 10101 et seq.).(D) Each vote center provides reasonable modifications and auxiliary aids and services as required by the federal Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990 (42 U.S.C. Sec. 12101 et seq.) and the federal Rehabilitation Act of 1973 (29 U.S.C. Sec. 701 et seq.).(7) (A) Beginning 10 days before the election, the county elections official maintains, in an electronic format, an index of voters who have done any of the following at one of the vote centers established pursuant to this section:(i) Registered to vote or updated the voter’s voter registration.(ii) Received and voted a provisional ballot or replacement ballot.(iii) Voted a ballot using equipment at the vote center.(B) The index required by subparagraph (A) includes the same information for each voter as is required to be included on copies of the roster that are posted pursuant to Section 14294. The index required by subparagraph (A) shall be updated continuously during any time that a vote center is open in the jurisdiction.(8) (A) No later than 29 days before the day of the election, the county elections official begins mailing to registered voters a vote by mail ballot packet that includes a return envelope with instructions for the use and return of the vote by mail ballot. The county elections official shall have five days to mail a ballot to each person who is registered to vote on the 29th day before the day of the election and five days for each subsequent registered voter. The county elections official shall not discriminate against any region or precinct in the county in choosing which ballots to mail first within the prescribed five-day mailing period.(B) The county elections official delivers to each voter, with either the sample ballot sent pursuant to Section 13303 or with the vote by mail ballot packet, all of the following:(i) A notice, translated in all languages identified pursuant to Section 2601 in its county as well as languages required under subdivision (a) of Section 14201 and Section 203 of the federal Voting Rights Act of 1965 (52 U.S.C. Sec. 10101 et seq.), that informs voters of all of the following:(I) An all-mailed ballot election is being conducted and each eligible voter will be issued a vote by mail ballot by mail.(II) The voter may cast a vote by mail ballot in person at a vote center during the times and days specified in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (4) or on election day.(III) No later than seven days before the day of the election, the voter may request the county elections official to send a vote by mail ballot in a language other than English pursuant to Section 203 of the federal Voting Rights Act of 1965 (52 U.S.C. Sec. 10101 et seq.), Section 2601, or Section 14201.(IV) No later than seven days before the day of the election, the voter may request the county elections official to send or deliver a ballot that voters with disabilities can read and mark privately and independently pursuant to the federal Help America Vote Act of 2002 (52 U.S.C. Sec. 20901 et seq.).(V) Language assistance hotlines provided by the county or Secretary of State.(ii) A list of the ballot dropoff locations and vote centers established pursuant to this section, including the dates and hours they are open. The list shall also be posted on the internet website of the county elections official in a format that is accessible for people with disabilities pursuant to Section 11135 of the Government Code.(iii) A postage-paid postcard that the voter may return to the county elections official for the purpose of requesting a vote by mail ballot in a language other than English or for the purpose of requesting a vote by mail ballot in an accessible format.(C) Upon request, the county elections official provides written voting materials to voters with disabilities in an accessible format, as required by the federal Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990 (42 U.S.C. Sec. 12101 et seq.) and the federal Rehabilitation Act of 1973 (29 U.S.C. Sec. 701 et seq.).(9) (A) The county elections official establishes a language accessibility advisory committee that is comprised of representatives of language minority communities. The committee shall be established and hold its first meeting before the public meeting required by clause (i) of subparagraph (A) of paragraph (10).(B) The county elections official establishes a voting accessibility advisory committee that is comprised of voters with disabilities. The committee shall be established and hold its first meeting before the public meeting required by clause (ii) of subparagraph (A) of paragraph (10).(C) A county with fewer than 50,000 registered voters may establish a joint advisory committee for language minority communities and voters with disabilities.(10) (A) The county elections official develops a draft plan for the administration of elections conducted pursuant to this section in consultation with the public, including both of the following:(i) One meeting, publicly noticed at least 10 days in advance of the meeting and held prior to the noticing of the draft plan pursuant to subparagraph (C), that includes representatives, advocates, and other stakeholders representing each community for which the county is required to provide voting materials and assistance in a language other than English under subdivision (a) of Section 14201 and the federal Voting Rights Act of 1965 (52 U.S.C. Sec. 10101 et seq.).(ii) One meeting, publicly noticed at least 10 days in advance of the meeting and held prior to the noticing of the draft plan pursuant to subparagraph (C), that includes representatives from the disability community and community organizations and individuals that advocate on behalf of, or provide services to, individuals with disabilities.(B) The county elections official, when developing the draft plan for the administration of elections conducted pursuant to this section, considers, at a minimum, all of the following:(i) Vote center and ballot dropoff location proximity to public transportation.(ii) Vote center and ballot dropoff location proximity to communities with historically low vote by mail usage.(iii) Vote center and ballot dropoff location proximity to population centers.(iv) Vote center and ballot dropoff location proximity to language minority communities.(v) Vote center and ballot dropoff location proximity to voters with disabilities.(vi) Vote center and ballot dropoff location proximity to communities with low rates of household vehicle ownership.(vii) Vote center and ballot dropoff location proximity to low-income communities.(viii) Vote center and ballot dropoff location proximity to communities of eligible voters who are not registered to vote and may need access to same day voter registration.(ix) Vote center and ballot dropoff location proximity to geographically isolated populations, including Native American reservations.(x) Access to accessible and free parking at vote centers and ballot dropoff locations.(xi) The distance and time a voter must travel by car or public transportation to a vote center and ballot dropoff location.(xii) The need for alternate methods for voters with disabilities for whom vote by mail ballots are not accessible to cast a ballot.(xiii) Traffic patterns near vote centers and ballot dropoff locations.(xiv) The need for mobile vote centers in addition to the number of vote centers established pursuant to this section.(xv) Vote center location on a public or private university or college campus.(C) The county elections official publicly notices the draft plan for the administration of elections conducted pursuant to this section and accepts public comments on the draft plan for at least 14 days before the public hearing held pursuant to subparagraph (D).(D) (i) Following the 14-day review period required by subparagraph (C), the county elections official holds a public hearing to consider the draft plan for the administration of elections conducted pursuant to this section and to accept public comments. The meeting shall be publicly noticed at least 10 days in advance of the meeting on the internet websites of the clerk of the county board of supervisors and the county elections official, or, if neither the clerk of the county board of supervisors nor the county elections official maintain an internet website, in the office of the county elections official.(ii) After the public hearing to consider the draft plan for the administration of elections conducted pursuant to this section and to accept public comments, the county elections official shall consider any public comments the official receives from the public and shall amend the draft plan in response to the public comments to the extent the official deems appropriate. The county elections official shall publicly notice the amended draft plan and shall accept public comments on the amended draft plan for at least 14 days before the county elections official may adopt the amended draft plan pursuant to subparagraph (E).(E) (i) No later than 120 days before the election and following the 14-day review and comment period required by clause (ii) of subparagraph (D), the county elections official shall adopt a final plan for the administration of elections conducted pursuant to this section. The county elections official shall submit the voter education and outreach plan that is required by clause (i) of subparagraph (I) to the Secretary of State for approval.(ii) The Secretary of State shall approve, approve with modifications, or reject a voter education and outreach plan submitted pursuant to clause (i) of subparagraph (I) within 14 days after the plan is submitted by the county elections official.(iii) The draft plan, the amended draft plan, and the adopted final plan for the administration of elections conducted pursuant to this section shall be posted on the internet website of the county elections official in each language in which the county is required to provide voting materials and assistance under subdivision (a) of Section 14201 and the federal Voting Rights Act of 1965 (52 U.S.C. Sec. 10101 et seq.), and the Secretary of State’s internet website in a format that is accessible for people with disabilities pursuant to Section 11135 of the Government Code.(F) Public meetings held pursuant to this paragraph shall, upon request, provide auxiliary aids and services to ensure effective communication with people with disabilities.(G) Within two years of the adoption of the first plan for the administration of elections conducted pursuant to this section, the county elections official shall hold public meetings in accordance with the procedures described in subparagraphs (C) to (F), inclusive, to consider revising the first plan for the administration of elections conducted pursuant to this section. Every four years thereafter, the county elections official shall hold public meetings in accordance with the procedures described in subparagraphs (C) to (F), inclusive, to consider revising the plan for the administration of elections conducted pursuant to this section.(H) (i) With reasonable public notification, a county elections official may amend a plan for the administration of elections conducted pursuant to this section no more than 120 days before the date of an election held pursuant to this section.(ii) With reasonable public notification, a county elections official may amend a plan for the administration of elections conducted pursuant to this section more than 120 days before the date of an election held pursuant to this section if the official provides at least 30 days to accept public comments on the amended plan.(I) The plan for the administration of elections conducted pursuant to this section, includes all of the following:(i) A voter education and outreach plan that is approved by the Secretary of State and that includes all of the following:(I) A description of how the county elections official will use the media, including social media, newspapers, radio, and television that serve language minority communities for purposes of informing voters of the upcoming election and promoting the toll-free voter assistance hotline.(II) A description of how the county elections official will use the media, including social media, newspapers, radio, and television for purposes of informing voters of the availability of a vote by mail ballot in an accessible format and the process for requesting such a ballot.(III) A description of how the county elections official will have a community presence to educate voters regarding the provisions of this section.(IV) A description of the accessible information that will be publicly available on the accessible internet website of the county elections official.(V) A description of the method used by the county elections official to identify language minority voters.(VI) A description of how the county elections official will educate and communicate the provisions of this section to the public, including:(ia) Communities for which the county is required to provide voting materials and assistance in a language other than English under subdivision (a) of Section 14201 and the federal Voting Rights Act of 1965 (52 U.S.C. Sec. 10101 et seq.). The county elections official shall hold at least one bilingual voter education workshop for each language in which the county is required to provide voting materials and assistance in a language other than English under subdivision (a) of Section 14201 and the federal Voting Rights Act of 1965 (52 U.S.C. Sec. 10101 et seq.).(ib) The disability community, including organizations and individuals that advocate on behalf of, or provide services to, individuals with disabilities. The county elections official shall hold at least one voter education workshop to increase accessibility and participation of eligible voters with disabilities.(VII) A description of how the county will spend the necessary resources on voter education and outreach to ensure that voters are fully informed about the election. This description shall include information about the amount of money the county plans to spend on voter education and outreach activities under the plan, and how that compares to the amount of money spent on voter education and outreach in recent similar elections in the same jurisdiction.(VIII) At least one public service announcement in the media, including newspapers, radio, and television, that serve English-speaking citizens for purposes of informing voters of the upcoming election and promoting the toll-free voter assistance hotline. Outreach made under this subclause shall include access for voters who are deaf or hard of hearing and voters who are blind or visually impaired.(IX) At least one public service announcement in the media, including newspapers, radio, and television, that serve non-English-speaking citizens for each language in which the county is required to provide voting materials and assistance under subdivision (a) of Section 14201 and the federal Voting Rights Act of 1965 (52 U.S.C. Sec. 10101 et seq.) for purposes of informing voters of the upcoming election and promoting the toll-free voter assistance hotline.(X) At least two direct contacts with voters for purposes of informing voters of the upcoming election and promoting the toll-free voter assistance hotline. The two direct contacts are in addition to any other required contacts, including, but not limited to, sample ballots and the delivery of vote by mail ballots.(ia) After the first six statewide elections conducted pursuant to this section, a county elections official may make one direct contact if the county elections official does both of the following:(Ia) Revises the plan for the administration of elections pursuant to subparagraph (G) to explain how at least half of the funds saved from not making a second direct contact will be used on targeted outreach to historically underrepresented voters.(Ib) Spends at least half of the funds saved from not making a second direct contact on targeted outreach to historically underrepresented voters.(ib) If direct contact is made by mail, the county elections official must mail at least one copy of each direct contact to voters with the same surname and postal address, in each language requested.(ic) At least one direct contact shall be made with voters during an election that is conducted either in a jurisdiction with fewer than 30,000 registered voters or conducted pursuant to subdivision (b) within 30 days of a regularly scheduled statewide election.(id) Notwithstanding sub-subclause (ia), a county elections official shall make at least two direct contacts with a voter for the first six statewide elections that the voter is registered to vote in the county.(ii) A description of how a voter with disabilities may request and receive a blank vote by mail ballot and, if a replacement ballot is necessary, a blank replacement ballot that a voter with disabilities can mark privately and independently.(iii) A description of how the county elections official will address significant disparities in voter accessibility and participation identified in the report required by subdivision (g).(iv) A description of the methods and standards that the county elections official will use to ensure the security of voting conducted at vote centers.(v) Information about estimated short-term and long-term costs and savings from conducting elections pursuant to this section as compared to recent similar elections in the same jurisdiction that were not conducted pursuant to this section.(vi) To the extent available at the time of publication, information on all of the following:(I) The total number of vote centers to be established.(II) The total number of ballot dropoff locations to be established.(III) The location of each vote center.(IV) The location of each ballot dropoff location and whether it is inside or outside.(V) A map of the locations of each vote center and ballot dropoff location.(VI) The hours of operation for each vote center.(VII) The hours of operation for each ballot dropoff location.(VIII) The security and contingency plans that would be implemented by the county elections official to do both of the following:(ia) Prevent a disruption of the vote center process.(ib) Ensure that the election is properly conducted if a disruption occurs.(IX) The number of election board members and the number of bilingual election board members and the languages spoken.(X) The services provided to voters with disabilities, including, but not limited to, the type and number of accessible voting machines and reasonable modifications at each vote center.(XI) The design, layout, and placement of equipment inside each vote center that protects each voter’s right to cast a private and independent ballot.(vii) A toll-free voter assistance hotline that is accessible to voters who are deaf or hard of hearing, and that is maintained by the county elections official that is operational no later than 29 days before the day of the election until 5 p.m. on the day after the election. The toll-free voter assistance hotline shall provide assistance to voters in all languages in which the county is required to provide voting materials and assistance under Section 2601, subdivision (a) of Section 14201, and the federal Voting Rights Act of 1965 (52 U.S.C. Sec. 10101 et seq.).(J) The plan for the administration of elections conducted pursuant to this section is posted in a format that is accessible to persons with disabilities on the internet website of the Secretary of State and on the internet website of the county elections official.(b) Notwithstanding Section 4000 or any other law, any county may conduct a special election as an all-mailed ballot election under this section if all of the following apply:(1) The county elections official has done either of the following:(A) Previously conducted an election as an all-mailed ballot election in accordance with subdivision (a).(B) Adopted a final plan for the administration of elections pursuant to clause (i) of subparagraph (E) of paragraph (10) of subdivision (a), in which case the county elections official shall complete all activities provided for in the voter education and outreach plan that is required by clause (i) of subparagraph (I) of paragraph (10) of subdivision (a) before the day of the special election.(2) (A) On the day of the election, from 7 a.m. to 8 p.m., inclusive, at least one vote center is provided for every 30,000 registered voters. If the jurisdiction is not wholly contained within the county, the county elections official shall make a reasonable effort to establish a vote center within the jurisdiction where the special election is held.(B) Notwithstanding subparagraph (A), for a jurisdiction with fewer than 30,000 registered voters, the county elections official makes a reasonable effort to establish a vote center.(3) (A) Not less than 10 days before the day of the election, for a minimum of eight hours per day, at least one vote center is provided for every 60,000 registered voters. If the jurisdiction is not wholly contained within the county, the county elections official shall make a reasonable effort to establish a vote center within the jurisdiction where the special election is held.(B) Notwithstanding subparagraph (A), for a jurisdiction with fewer than 30,000 registered voters, the county elections official makes a reasonable effort to establish a vote center.(4) (A) At least one ballot dropoff location is provided for every 15,000 registered voters. At least one ballot dropoff location shall be located within the jurisdiction where the special election is held. All ballot dropoff locations shall be open at least during regular business hours beginning not less than 28 days before the day of the election, and on the day of the election.(B) Notwithstanding subparagraph (A), for a jurisdiction with fewer than 15,000 registered voters, at least one ballot dropoff location shall be provided.(c) Except as otherwise provided in this section, the election day procedures shall be conducted in accordance with Division 14 (commencing with Section 14000).(d) The county elections official may provide, at the official’s discretion, additional ballot dropoff locations and vote centers for purposes of this section.(e) The return of voted vote by mail ballots is subject to Sections 3017 and 3020.(f) For the sole purpose of reporting the results of an election conducted pursuant to this section, upon completion of the ballot count, the county elections official shall divide the jurisdiction into precincts pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 12220) of Chapter 3 of Division 12 and shall prepare a statement of the results of the election in accordance with Sections 15373 and 15374.(g) (1) (A) Within six months of each election conducted pursuant to this section, the Secretary of State shall submit a final report to the Legislature on all of the following information by categories of race, ethnicity, language preference, age, gender, disability, permanent vote by mail status, historical polling place voters, political party affiliation, and language minorities as it relates to the languages required under Section 2601, subdivision (a) of Section 14201, and Section 203 of the federal Voting Rights Act of 1965 (52 U.S.C. Sec. 10101 et seq.):(i) Voter turnout.(ii) Voter registration.(iii) Ballot rejection rates.(iv) Reasons for ballot rejection.(v) Provisional ballot use.(vi) Accessible vote by mail ballot use.(vii) The number of votes cast at each vote center.(viii) The number of ballots returned at ballot dropoff locations.(ix) The number of ballots returned by mail.(x) The number of persons who registered to vote at a vote center.(xi) Instances of voter fraud.(xii) Any other problems that became known to the county elections official or the Secretary of State during the election or canvass.(B) The report required by subparagraph (A) shall be posted on the internet website of the Secretary of State in a format that is accessible for people with disabilities pursuant to Section 11135 of the Government Code.(C) The report required by subparagraph (A) shall be submitted to the Legislature in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.(D) If an election is conducted pursuant to this section, the county shall submit, to the extent possible, to the Secretary of State the information needed for the Secretary of State to prepare the report required by subparagraph (A).(E) The Secretary of State may contract with any qualified person or organization for purposes of preparing the report required by subparagraph (A).(2) Within nine months of the certification of the results of each election conducted pursuant to this section, the county elections official shall post on the official’s internet website a report that compares the cost of elections conducted pursuant to this section to the costs of previous elections. The report shall be posted in a format that is accessible for people with disabilities pursuant to Section 11135 of the Government Code.(h) The Secretary of State shall enforce the provisions of this section pursuant to Section 12172.5 of the Government Code.(i) For purposes of this section, “disability” has the same meaning as defined in subdivisions (j), (m), and (n) of Section 12926 of the Government Code.(j) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2030.SEC. 5. Section 9054 of the Elections Code is amended to read:9054. (a) Whenever a city, county, or city and county is required by Section 2601 or Section 14201, or by Section 203 (52 U.S.C. Sec. 10503) or Section 4(f)(4) (52 U.S.C. Sec. 10303(f)(4)) of the federal Voting Rights Act of 1965, to provide a translation of ballot materials in a language other than English, the Secretary of State shall provide a translation of the ballot title and summary prepared pursuant to Sections 9050 and 9051 and of the ballot label prepared pursuant to Section 13247 in that language to the city, county, or city and county for each state measure submitted to the voters in a statewide election not later than 68 days before that election.(b) When preparing a translation in a language other than English pursuant to subdivision (a), the Secretary of State shall consult with an advisory body consisting of language experts and nonpartisan organizations that advocate on behalf of, or provide services to, individuals that speak that language.(c) All translations prepared pursuant to this section shall be made available for public examination in the same time and manner as the state voter information guide is made available for public examination in accordance with Section 88006 of the Government Code and Section 9092 of this code.(d) The local elections official shall use that translation of the ballot label on the state voter information guide and the official ballot and may not select or contract with another person to provide translations of the same text.SEC. 6. Section 10240 of the Elections Code is amended to read:10240. (a) The city elections official shall have the necessary ballots printed and shall procure and furnish to the election officers the necessary supplies and equipment as specified in Sections 14105 and 14110. The elections official shall see that they are properly distributed to each precinct prior to the opening of the polls on the day of election.(b) The city elections official shall provide language assistance in all languages required in the jurisdiction under Section 2601, subdivision (c) of Section 12303, and Section 203 of the federal Voting Rights Act of 1965 (52 U.S.C. Sec. 10503). This subdivision does not apply to an election for an advisory body.SEC. 7. Section 13107 of the Elections Code is amended to read:13107. (a) With the exception of candidates for Justice of the State Supreme Court or court of appeal, immediately under the name of each candidate, and not separated from the name by any line, unless the designation made by the candidate pursuant to Section 8002.5 must be listed immediately below the name of the candidate pursuant to Section 13105, and in that case immediately under the designation, may appear at the option of the candidate only one of the following designations:(1) Words designating the elective city, county, district, state, or federal office which the candidate holds at the time of filing the nomination documents to which the candidate was elected by vote of the people.(2) The word “incumbent” if the candidate is a candidate for the same office which the candidate holds at the time of filing the nomination papers, and was elected to that office by a vote of the people. A candidate shall not use the word “incumbent” if the candidate was elected to their office in an at-large election and is a candidate in a district-based election.(3) No more than three words designating either the current principal professions, vocations, or occupations of the candidate, or the principal professions, vocations, or occupations of the candidate during the calendar year immediately preceding the filing of nomination documents.(4) The phrase “appointed incumbent” if the candidate holds an office by virtue of appointment, and the candidate is a candidate for election to the same office, or, if the candidate is a candidate for election to the same office or to some other office, the word “appointed” and the title of the office. In either instance, the candidate may not use the unmodified word “incumbent” or any words designating the office unmodified by the word “appointed.” However, the phrase “appointed incumbent” shall not be required of a candidate who seeks reelection to an office which the candidate holds and to which the candidate was appointed, as a nominated candidate, in lieu of an election, pursuant to Sections 5326 and 5328 of the Education Code or Section 7228, 7423, 7673, 10229, or 10515 of this code.(b) (1) Except as specified in paragraph (2), for candidates for judicial office, immediately under the name of each candidate, and not separated from the name by any line, only one of the following designations may appear at the option of the candidate:(A) Words designating the city, county, district, state, or federal office held by the candidate at the time of filing the nomination documents.(B) The word “incumbent” if the candidate is a candidate for the same office that the candidate holds at the time of filing the nomination papers.(C) No more than three words designating either the current principal professions, vocations, or occupations of the candidate, or the principal professions, vocations, or occupations of the candidate during the calendar year immediately preceding the filing of nomination documents.(2) For a candidate for judicial office who is an active member of the State Bar employed by a city, county, district, state, or by the United States, the designation shall appear as one of the following:(A) Words designating the actual job title, as defined by statute, charter, or other governing instrument.(B) One of the following ballot designations: “Attorney,” “Attorney at Law,” “Lawyer,” or “Counselor at Law.” The designations “Attorney” and “Lawyer” may be used in combination with one other current principal profession, vocation, or occupation of the candidate, or the principal profession, vocation, or occupation of the candidate during the calendar year immediately preceding the filing of nomination documents.(3) A designation made pursuant to subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) or paragraph (2) shall also contain relevant qualifiers, as follows:(A) If the candidate is an official or employee of a city, the name of the city shall appear preceded by the words “City of.”(B) If the candidate is an official or employee of a county, the name of the county shall appear preceded by the words “County of.”(C) If the candidate is an official or employee of a city and county, the name of the city and county shall appear preceded by the words “City and County.”(D) If the candidate performs quasi-judicial functions for a governmental agency, the full name of the agency shall be included.(c) A candidate for superior court judge who is an active member of the State Bar and practices law as one of the candidate’s principal professions shall use one of the following ballot designations as the candidate’s ballot designation: “Attorney,” “Attorney at Law,” “Lawyer,” or “Counselor at Law.” The designations “Attorney” and “Lawyer” may be used in combination with one other current principal profession, vocation, or occupation of the candidate, or the principal profession, vocation, or occupation of the candidate during the calendar year immediately preceding the filing of nomination documents.(d) For purposes of this section, all California geographical names shall be considered to be one word. Hyphenated words that appear in any generally available standard reference dictionary, published in the United States at any time within the 10 calendar years immediately preceding the election for which the words are counted, including a generally available standard reference dictionary published online, shall be considered as one word. Each part of all other hyphenated words shall be counted as a separate word.(e) The Secretary of State and any other elections official shall not accept a designation of which any of the following would be true:(1) It would mislead the voter.(2) It would suggest an evaluation of a candidate, such as outstanding, leading, expert, virtuous, or eminent.(3) It abbreviates the word “retired” or places it following any word or words which it modifies.(4) It uses a word or prefix, such as “former” or “ex-,” which means a prior status. The only exception is the use of the word “retired.”(5) It uses the name of any political party, whether or not it has qualified for the ballot.(6) It uses a word or words referring to a racial, religious, or ethnic group.(7) It refers to any activity prohibited by law.(f) If, upon checking the nomination documents and the ballot designation worksheet described in Section 13107.3, the elections official finds the designation to be in violation of any of the restrictions set forth in this section, the elections official shall notify the candidate by registered or certified mail return receipt requested, addressed to the mailing address provided on the candidate’s ballot designation worksheet.(1) The candidate shall, within three days, excluding Saturday, Sunday, and state holidays, from the date the candidate receives notice by registered or certified mail, or from the date the candidate receives actual notice of the violation, whichever occurs first, appear before the elections official or, in the case of the Secretary of State, notify the Secretary of State by telephone, and provide a designation that complies with subdivision (a) or (b).(2) If a candidate fails to provide a designation that complies with subdivision (a) or (b) within the three-day period specified in paragraph (1), a designation shall not appear after the candidate’s name.(g) A designation given by a candidate shall not be changed by the candidate after the final date for filing nomination documents, except as specifically requested by the elections official as specified in subdivision (f) or as provided in subdivision (h). The elections official shall maintain a copy of the ballot designation worksheet for each candidate that appears on the ballot in the county for the same period of time as applied to nomination documents pursuant to Section 17100.(h) The designation shall remain the same for all purposes of both primary and general elections, unless the candidate, at least 98 days before the general election, requests in writing a different designation which the candidate is entitled to use at the time of the request.(i) In all cases, the words so used shall be printed in a manner consistent with the space requirements of Sections 13207 and 13211.(j) If a foreign language translation of a candidate’s designation is required under Section 2601, Section 14201, or the federal Voting Rights Act of 1965 (52 U.S.C. Sec. 10101 et seq.), as amended, to appear on the ballot in addition to the English language version, it shall be as short as possible, as consistent as is practicable with this section, and shall employ abbreviations and initials wherever possible in order to avoid undue length.SEC. 8. Section 13209 of the Elections Code is amended to read:13209. Whenever a foreign translation of the ballot is required by Section 2601, Section 14201, or the federal Voting Rights Act of 1965, as amended by Public Law 94-73, to appear on the ballot as well as the English language version, the ballot may be so designed as to place the foreign translation next to the voting target.SEC. 9. Section 13211.7 of the Elections Code is amended to read:13211.7. (a) (1) In jurisdictions required to provide translated ballot materials pursuant to Section 2601, Section 14201, or Section 203 of the federal Voting Rights Act of 1965 (52 U.S.C. Sec. 10503), as those sections may be amended from time to time, any ballot that provides a translation of a candidate’s name shall contain a phonetic transliteration of the candidate’s name, except as provided in subdivision (b).(2) This section applies only to character-based languages, including, but not limited to, Mandarin Chinese, Cantonese, Japanese, and Korean.(3) If a candidate’s name is to appear on the ballot in more than one jurisdiction in an election, all of those jurisdictions required to provide translated ballot materials pursuant to Section 2601, Section 14201, or Section 203 of the federal Voting Rights Act of 1965 (52 U.S.C. Sec. 10503) shall use the same phonetic transliteration or character-based translation of the name.(4) (A) In a jurisdiction in which separate ballots containing translations of the candidates’ names are printed in different languages, both the alphabet-based names and the translations of the candidates’ names, for candidates that have translated names, shall appear on the translated ballot.(B) If a jurisdiction is unable to comply with subparagraph (A) due to limitations of its existing voting system, any new voting system purchased by the jurisdiction after July 1, 2020, shall be able to accommodate the requirements of subparagraph (A).(b) If a candidate has a character-based name by birth, that can be verified by birth certificate or other valid identification, the candidate may use that name on the ballot instead of a phonetic transliteration. A candidate who does not have a character-based name by birth, but who identifies by a particular character-based name and can demonstrate to the local elections official that the candidate has been known and identified within the public sphere by that name over the past two years, may use that name instead of a phonetic transliteration.SEC. 10. Section 13307 of the Elections Code is amended to read:13307. (a) (1) Each candidate for nonpartisan elective office in any local agency, including any city, county, city and county, or district, may prepare a candidate’s statement on an appropriate form provided by the elections official. The statement may include the name, age, and occupation of the candidate and a brief description, of no more than 200 words, of the candidate’s own education and qualifications expressed by the candidate. However, the governing body of the local agency may authorize an increase in the limitations on words for the statement from 200 to 400 words. The statement shall not include the party affiliation of the candidate, nor membership or activity in partisan political organizations.(2) The statement authorized by this subdivision shall be filed in the office of the elections official when the candidate’s nomination papers are returned for filing, if it is for a primary election, or for an election for offices for which there is no primary. The statement shall be filed in the office of the elections official no later than the 88th day before the election, if it is for an election for which nomination papers are not required to be filed. If a runoff election or general election occurs within 88 days of the primary or first election, the statement shall be filed with the elections official by the third day following the governing body’s declaration of the results from the primary or first election.(3) Except as provided in Section 13309, the statement may be withdrawn, but not changed, during the period for filing nomination papers and until 5 p.m. of the next working day after the close of the nomination period.(b) (1) The elections official shall send to each voter a county voter information guide that contains the written statements of each candidate that is prepared pursuant to subdivision (a). The statement of each candidate shall be printed in type of uniform size and darkness, and with uniform spacing.(2) The elections official shall provide a Spanish translation to those candidates who wish to have one, and shall select a person to provide that translation who is one of the following:(A) A certified and registered interpreter on the Judicial Council Master List.(B) An interpreter categorized as “certified” or “professionally qualified” by the Administrative Office of the United States Courts.(C) From an institution accredited by a regional or national accrediting agency recognized by the United States Secretary of Education.(D) A current voting member in good standing of the American Translators Association.(E) A current member in good standing of the American Association of Language Specialists.(F) A translator or interpreter with demonstrated experience in translating official or legal documents who has been referred by a nonprofit organization specializing in language access, legal aid, or community advocacy.(c) (1) In addition to the statement prepared pursuant to subdivision (a), if the elections official who is conducting the election or the county elections official who is conducting a local agency’s election, including a local election that is consolidated with the county election, permits electronic distribution of a candidate’s statement, each candidate for nonpartisan elective office in the local agency may prepare a candidate’s statement for the purpose of electronic distribution pursuant to this subdivision.(2) A statement prepared pursuant to this subdivision shall be posted on the website of the elections official, and may be included in a voter’s pamphlet that is electronically distributed by the elections official pursuant to Section 13300.7, but shall not be included in a voter’s pamphlet that is printed and mailed to voters pursuant to subdivision (b).(3) A statement that is printed in the voter’s pamphlet and mailed to voters pursuant to subdivision (b) shall be included with the statement that is prepared and electronically distributed pursuant to this subdivision.(4) A statement that is prepared and electronically distributed pursuant to this subdivision shall be displayed in type of uniform size and darkness, and with uniform spacing.(5) The elections official shall provide a Spanish translation to those candidates who wish to have one, and shall select a person to provide that translation who is one of the persons listed in paragraph (2) of subdivision (b).(d) The local agency may estimate the total cost of printing, handling, translating, mailing, and electronically distributing candidate’s statements filed pursuant to this section, including costs incurred as a result of complying with Section 2601 and the federal Voting Rights Act of 1965, as amended. The local agency may require each candidate filing a statement to pay in advance to the local agency the candidate’s estimated pro rata share as a condition of having the candidate’s statement included in the county voter information guide or electronically distributed. In the event the estimated payment is required, the receipt for the payment shall include a written notice that the estimate is just an approximation of the actual cost that varies from one election to another election and may be significantly more or less than the estimate, depending on the actual number of candidates filing statements. Accordingly, the local agency is not bound by the estimate and may, on a pro rata basis, bill the candidate for additional actual expense or refund any excess paid depending on the final actual cost. In the event of underpayment, the local agency may require the candidate to pay the balance of the cost incurred. In the event of overpayment, the local agency that, or the elections official who, collected the estimated cost shall prorate the excess amount among the candidates and refund the excess amount paid within 30 days of the election.(e) This section shall not be deemed to make any statement, or the authors of any statement, free or exempt from any civil or criminal action or penalty because of any false, slanderous, or libelous statements offered for printing electronic distribution pursuant to this section or contained in the county voter information guide.(f) Before the nominating period opens, the local agency for that election shall determine whether a charge shall be levied against that candidate for the candidate’s statement sent to each voter and, if authorized pursuant to subdivision (c), for the electronically distributed candidate’s statement. This decision shall not be revoked or modified after the seventh day before the opening of the nominating period. A written statement of the regulations with respect to charges for handling, packaging, mailing, and electronic distribution shall be provided to each candidate or each candidate’s representative, at the time they pick up the nomination papers.(g) For purposes of this section and Section 13310, the board of supervisors is the governing body of judicial elections.SEC. 11. Section 13400 of the Elections Code is amended to read:13400. (a) A vote by mail voter may request that a facsimile copy of the ballot in the language of the voter’s preference be sent by regular mail or electronic mail if the voter lives in a precinct that requires a facsimile copy of the ballot in that language pursuant to Section 14201. The county elections officer shall provide instructions to vote by mail voters in the county voter information guide and on the county elections internet website on how to request a facsimile copy of a ballot, in all languages that the county is required to provide facsimile copies of ballots. A vote by mail voter may request a facsimile copy of a ballot by telephone, mail, online, or when requesting a vote by mail ballot from the county no later than seven days before election day.(b) The county elections official shall prepare the requested facsimile copies described in subdivision (a) no later than 10 days before election day. Requests received by the county elections official 10 days or more before election day shall be processed by the 10th day prior to election day.(c) This section does not limit an elections official from distributing facsimile copies of the ballot more widely than as required by subdivision (a) or earlier than required by subdivision (b).(d) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2030, and as of that date is repealed.SEC. 12. Section 14111 of the Elections Code is amended to read:14111. Translations of the ballot measures and ballot instructions, as required by Section 2601 and Section 14201, shall be provided by a person selected by the elections official who is one of the following:(a) A certified and registered interpreter on the Judicial Council Master List.(b) An interpreter categorized as “certified” or “professionally qualified” by the Administrative Office of the United States Courts.(c) From an institution accredited by a regional or national accrediting agency recognized by the United States Secretary of Education.(d) A current voting member in good standing of the American Translators Association.(e) A current member in good standing of the American Association of Language Specialists.(f) A translator or interpreter with demonstrated experience in translating official or legal documents who has been referred by a nonprofit organization specializing in language access, legal aid, or community advocacy.SEC. 13. Section 14200 of the Elections Code is amended to read:14200. A member of each precinct board shall cause the following voting information to be publicly posted at each polling place:(a) A sample version of the ballot that will be used for the election.(b) Information regarding the date of the election and the hours during which polling places will be open.(c) Instructions on how to vote, including how to cast a vote and how to cast a provisional ballot.(d) Instructions for mail-in registrants and first-time voters under Section 303(b) of the federal Help America Vote Act of 2002 (52 U.S.C. Sec. 20901 et seq.).(e) General information on voting rights under applicable federal and state laws, including information on the right of an individual to cast a provisional ballot and instructions on how to contact the appropriate officials if these rights are alleged to have been violated.(f) General information on federal and state laws regarding prohibitions on acts of fraud and misrepresentation as they pertain to elections.(g) Information regarding the languages other than English in which members of the precinct board can assist voters. The information shall be provided in all of the languages other than English spoken by the members.(h) Information regarding other available language assistance, such as a toll-free voter assistance hotline.SEC. 14. Section 14201 of the Elections Code is amended to read:14201. (a) In counties and precincts where the Secretary of State has determined that it is appropriate, the county elections official shall provide facsimile copies of the ballot, as described in subdivision (b), with the ballot measures and ballot instructions printed in Spanish, one of which shall be posted in a conspicuous location in the polling place and at least one of which shall be made available for voters at the polling place to use as a reference when casting a private ballot. Facsimile ballots shall also be printed in other languages and provided in the same manner if a significant and substantial need is found by the Secretary of State. A facsimile copy of the ballot available for voters to use in casting a private ballot shall be sufficiently distinct in appearance from a regular ballot to prevent voters from attempting to vote on the facsimile copy.(b) (1) In determining if it is appropriate to provide the election materials in Spanish or other languages, the Secretary of State shall determine the number of residents of voting age in each county and precinct who are members of a single language minority, and who lack sufficient skills in English to vote without assistance. If the number of these residents equals 3 percent or more of the voting-age residents of a particular county or precinct, or if interested citizens or organizations provide the Secretary of State with information that gives the Secretary of State sufficient reason to believe a need for the furnishing of facsimile ballots, the Secretary of State shall find a need to provide at least two facsimile copies with the ballot measures and ballot instructions printed in Spanish or other applicable language in the affected polling places.(2) If the Secretary of State determines that the number of voting-age residents in a precinct who are members of a single language minority and who lack sufficient skills in English to vote without assistance exceeds 20 percent of the voting-age residents in that precinct, the county elections official shall provide at least four facsimile copies of the ballot in the language of that language minority, one of which shall be posted in a conspicuous location in the polling place and at least three of which shall be made available for voters at the polling place to use as a reference when casting a private ballot.(c) (1) In polling places where facsimile copies of the ballot are necessary, members of the precinct boards shall be trained on the purpose and proper handling of the facsimile copies of the ballot and shall be prepared to inform voters of the existence of the facsimile copies of the ballot, as appropriate.(2) If a voter requests a facsimile copy of a ballot that is available in the voter’s language of preference pursuant to subdivision (a), a member of the precinct board shall provide the facsimile copy of the ballot to the voter.(3) In polling places where facsimile copies of the ballot are necessary, a sign near the roster shall inform voters of the existence of the facsimile copies of the ballot. The sign shall be in English and in the language or languages of the facsimile copies available in that polling place.(d) At least 14 days before an election, the county elections official shall provide information on the county elections internet website identifying all polling places in the county and the languages of facsimile copies of the ballot that will be available to voters at each polling place. Explanatory information pertaining to the list of polling places, but not the list itself, shall be available in all languages in which the county provides facsimile copies of the ballot.(e) The county elections official shall include text in the county voter information guide that refers voters with language needs to the portion of the county elections internet website containing the information specified in subdivision (d). The text shall be in all languages in which the county provides facsimile copies of the ballot.(f) The Secretary of State shall make the determinations and findings set forth in subdivisions (a) and (b) by January 1 of each year in which the Governor is elected.(g) (1) A county elections official shall not be required to provide facsimile copies of the ballot in a particular language if the county elections official is required to provide translated ballots in that language pursuant to Section 203 of the federal Voting Rights Act of 1965 (52 U.S.C. Sec. 10101 et seq.).(2) In a polling place where a county elections official is required pursuant to subdivision (a) to provide a facsimile copy of the ballot in a language other than English, the county elections official may instead provide voters with a ballot translated into that language. A county elections official who provides and publicizes translated ballots in the same manner as translated ballots provided and publicized pursuant to Section 203 of the federal Voting Rights Act of 1965 (52 U.S.C. Sec. 10101 et seq.), in lieu of providing facsimile copies of the ballot in any language required under subdivision (a), need not comply with subdivisions (c), (d), and (e) as pertaining to that language.(h) It is the intent of the Legislature that non-English-speaking citizens, like all other citizens, should be encouraged to vote. Therefore, appropriate efforts should be made on a statewide basis to minimize obstacles to voting by citizens who lack sufficient skill in English to vote without assistance.(i) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2030, and as of that date is repealed.SEC. 15. Section 14219 of the Elections Code is amended to read:14219. (a) The precinct board shall provide, upon request, to a voter for use in the voting booth or compartment, a copy of the facsimile ballot containing ballot measures and instructions printed in Spanish or in other languages, as required by Section 14201, unless county voter information guides and ballots for voting are already being provided in that language under the federal Voting Rights Act of 1965, as amended by Public Law 94-73.(b) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2030, and as of that date is repealed.SEC. 16. Section 19101 of the Elections Code is amended to read:19101. (a) The Secretary of State shall adopt and publish voting system standards and regulations governing the use of voting systems. The Secretary of State shall adopt standards that meet or exceed federal voluntary voting system guidelines set forth by the United States Election Assistance Commission or its successor agency. Until state standards are adopted, the Voluntary Voting System Guidelines Draft Version 1.1, as submitted to the United States Election Assistance Commission on August 31, 2012, shall be used as state standards to the extent that they do not conflict with this code. The Secretary of State may require additional testing to ensure that voting systems meet the requirements of this code.(b) Voting system standards adopted by the Secretary of State pursuant to subdivision (a) shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following requirements:(1) The machine or device and its software shall be suitable for the purpose for which it is intended.(2) The system shall preserve the secrecy of the ballot.(3) The system shall be safe from fraud or manipulation.(4) The system shall be accessible to voters with disabilities pursuant to Section 19242 and applicable federal laws.(5) The system shall be accessible to voters who require assistance in a language other than English if the language is one in which a ballot or ballot materials are required to be made available to voters pursuant to Section 2601, Section 14201, and applicable federal laws.SEC. 17. If the Commission on State Mandates determines that this act contains costs mandated by the state, reimbursement to local agencies and school districts for those costs shall be made pursuant to Part 7 (commencing with Section 17500) of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code.